Utah statutes.
7-7-6.   Name requirements -- Establishment or changing location of offices.

(1) (a)  The name of every association shall include the words "savings association" or "savings and loan," or "savings bank." The name of an association may be changed from time to time but may not be the same as, or deceptively similar to, the name of an existing association or federal association doing business in this state or a bank or national bank; and is subject to the other requirements for corporate names in Section 16-10a-401.  This prohibition applies only to a domestic association formed after June 30, 1981, and an out-of-state association issued a certificate of authority after June 30, 1981.

(b)  Without the prior approval of the commissioner, no association may change its name from that fixed in its certificate of authority.

(2) (a)  Without the prior approval of the commissioner, as provided in this chapter, no association may establish or maintain any office other than its home office, which shall be in the location specified in the certificate of authority.

(b)  No office of an association may be moved from its immediate vicinity, nor may the location of the home office of an association be changed unless approved by the commissioner, after notice to any other association that may be adversely effected by the change, and after an opportunity for a hearing.

